Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,278
Uniform Standard Code for Mobile Home Parks, how cited.

Sections 81-15,278 to 81-15,291 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Standard Code for Mobile Home Parks.

Laws 1976, LB 91, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4634;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 18.